Utah statutes.
78B-12-207.   Obligation -- Adjusted gross income used.

Adjusted gross income shall be used in calculating each parent's share of the base combined child support obligation.  Only income of the natural or adoptive parents of the child may be used to determine the award under these guidelines.

